Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.200

Judgment on award.

(1) On granting an order confirming, vacating without directing a rehearing, or amending an award under this chapter, the court shall enter judgment in conformity with the order.

(2) On motion of a party, the court may order that a document or part of the arbitration record be sealed or redacted to prevent public disclosure of all or part of the record or award to the extent permitted under law of this state other than this chapter.

[ 2023 c 61 s 21.]